Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.400

Elections—Qualifications of electors—Voting place.

Qualifications of electors at all school elections shall be the same as at a general state or county election. Except as otherwise provided by law, only those electors residing within the district shall be entitled to vote, and an elector may vote only at the polling place designated by the proper election official.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.520. Prior: 1941 c 12 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 5025-1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.520, 28.58.520.]